Utah statutes.
75-7-112.   Penalty provisions.
A provision in a trust instrument purporting to penalize a beneficiary by
charging the beneficiary's interest in the trust, or to penalize the
beneficiary in another manner, for instituting a proceeding to challenge the
acts of the trustee or other fiduciary of a trust, or for instituting other
proceedings relating to the trust is unenforceable if probable cause exists
for instituting the proceedings.
